zh-TW: 車門鎖包含組件: 控制模組; 車門鎖扣; 車門鎖致動器; 車外把手連桿; 車內門鎖旋鈕/拉桿; 鑰匙; 鎖芯; 安裝五金; 遙控鑰匙; 線束; 其他
de: Enthaltene Komponenten des Fahrzeugtürschlosses: Steuermodul; Türschloss/Falle; Türschloss-Stellmotor; Außentürgriff-Gestänge; Innenschließknopf/-gestänge; Schlüssel; Schließzylinder; Befestigungsmaterial; Fernbedienung(en); Kabelbaum; Sonstiges
da: Medfølgende komponenter til bildørlås: Kontrolmodul; Dørlås; Dørlåsaktuator; Forbindelse til udvendigt håndtag; Indvendig låseknap/-stang; Nøgler; Låsecylinder; Monteringsudstyr; Fjernbetjening(er); Ledningsnet; Andet
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės durelių spynos komplekte esantys komponentai: Valdymo modulis; Durų skląstis; Durų užrakto pavara; Išorinės rankenos jungtis; Vidinio užrakto mygtukas / traukė; Raktai; Spynos cilindras; Tvirtinimo elementai; Nuotolinio valdymo pultelis (-iai); Laidų pynė; Kita
ja: 車両ドアロック同梱コンポーネント: コントロールモジュール; ドアラッチ; ドアロックアクチュエーター; エクステリアハンドルリンケージ; インテリアロックノブ/ロッド; キー; ロックシリンダー; 取り付け金具; リモコンキー; ワイヤーハーネス; その他
el: Περιλαμβανόμενα εξαρτήματα κλειδαριάς πόρτας οχήματος: Μονάδα ελέγχου; Μάνταλο πόρτας; Ενεργοποιητής κλειδαριάς πόρτας; Σύνδεσμος εξωτερικής λαβής; Εσωτερικό κουμπί/ράβδος κλειδώματος; Κλειδιά; Κύλινδρος κλειδαριάς; Υλικά στερέωσης; Τηλεχειριστήρια (Fobs); Πλεξούδα καλωδίωσης; Άλλο
hr-HR: Uključene komponente brave na vratima vozila: Upravljački modul; Brava vrata; Aktuator brave vrata; Poluga vanjske ručke; Unutarnji gumb/šipka za zaključavanje; Ključevi; Cilindar brave; Oprema za montažu; Daljinski upravljač(i); Kabelski svežanj; Ostalo
sl-SI: Vključene komponente ključavnice vrat vozila: Krmilni modul; Vratna ključavnica; Aktuator vratne ključavnice; Povezava zunanje kljuke; Notranji gumb/palica za zaklepanje; Ključi; Cilinder ključavnice; Pritrdilni material; Daljinski upravljalniki; Kabelski snop; Drugo
nl: Voertuigdeurslot meegeleverde componenten: Regelmodule; Deursluiting; Deurslotactuator; Buitenste deurkrukkoppeling; Binnenste slotknop/-stang; Sleutels; Slotcilinder; Montagemateriaal; Afstandsbediening(en); Kabelboom; Overig
en: Vehicle door lock included components: Control module; Door latch; Door lock actuator; Exterior handle linkage; Interior lock knob/rod; Keys; Lock cylinder; Mounting hardware; Remote fob(s); Wiring harness; Other
fr: Composants inclus avec la serrure de porte du véhicule: Module de commande; Loquet de porte; Actionneur de serrure de porte; Tringlerie de poignée extérieure; Bouton/tige de verrouillage intérieur; Clés; Barillet de serrure; Matériel de montage; Télécommande(s); Faisceau de câbles; Autre
vi: Các bộ phận bao gồm khóa cửa xe: Mô-đun điều khiển; Chốt cửa; Cơ cấu chấp hành khóa cửa; Khớp nối tay nắm ngoài; Núm/thanh khóa trong; Chìa khóa; Ổ khóa; Dụng cụ lắp ráp; Chìa khóa điều khiển từ xa (Fob); Bộ dây điện; Khác
bg-BG: Включени компоненти към автомобилната брава: Управляващ модул; Ключалка на вратата; Задвижващ механизъм на ключалката; Механизъм за външната дръжка; Вътрешен бутон/лост за заключване; Ключове; Патронник; Монтажен хардуер; Дистанционно(и); Кабелен сноп; Друго
sv: Komponenter som ingår i fordonsdörrlåset: Styrmodul; Dörrlås; Dörrlåsaktuator; Länkage för yttre dörrhandtag; Inre låsknapp/stång; Nycklar; Låscylinder; Monteringsutrustning; Fjärrnyckel/fjärrnycklar; Kablage; Övrigt
pt-PT: Componentes incluídos no fecho da porta do veículo: Módulo de controlo; Trinco da porta; Atuador da fechadura da porta; Ligação ao manípulo exterior; Botão/haste da fechadura interior; Chaves; Canhão da fechadura; Equipamento de montagem; Comando(s) à distância; Arnês de cabos; Outro
ro-RO: Componentele incluse ale încuietorii ușii vehiculului: Modul de control; Încuietoare portieră; Actuator pentru blocarea portierei; Articulație mâner exterior; Buton/tijă de blocare interioară; Chei; Butuc încuietoare; Piese de montaj; Telecomandă(e); Cablaj; Altele
es: Componentes incluidos en la cerradura de la puerta del vehículo: Módulo de control; Pestillo de puerta; Actuador de cerradura de puerta; Conexión de manija exterior; Perilla/varilla de bloqueo interior; Llaves; Cilindro de cerradura; Herrajes de montaje; Llaveros remotos; Arnés de cableado; Otro
nb: Komponenter inkludert i bilens dørlås: Kontrollmodul; Dørlås; Dørlåsaktuator; Utvendig håndtaksstag; Innvendig låseknapp/-stang; Nøkler; Låsesylinder; Monteringsutstyr; Fjernkontroll(er); Ledningsnett; Annet
ru: Комплект компонентов замка двери автомобиля: Модуль управления; Дверная защелка; Актуатор дверного замка; Тяга наружной ручки; Внутренняя кнопка/тяга блокировки; Ключи; Личинка замка; Крепежные элементы; Брелок(и) ДУ; Жгут проводов; Другое
hu: Járműajtó zárjához való tartozékok: Vezérlőmodul; Ajtózárszerkezet; Ajtózár-működtető; Külsőkilincs-rudazat; Belső zárgomb / -rúd; Kulcsok; Zárhenger; Rögzítőelemek; Távirányító(k); Kábelkorbács; Egyéb
cs: Obsah balení zámku vozidla: Řídicí modul; Západka dveří; Servomotor zámku dveří; Táhlo vnější kliky; Vnitřní zamykací kolík / táhlo; Klíče; Vložka zámku; Montážní hardware; Dálkový ovladač / ovladače; Kabelový svazek; Jiné
it: Componenti inclusi nella serratura per portiera del veicolo: Modulo di controllo; Serratura dello sportello; Attuatore della serratura; Tiranti della maniglia esterna; Pomello/asta di blocco interno; Chiavi; Cilindro della serratura; Ferramenta di montaggio; Telecomandi; Cablaggio; Altro
pt-BR: Fechadura da porta do veículo componentes incluídos: Módulo de controle; Fecho da porta; Atuador da trava da porta; Articulação da maçaneta externa; Pino/haste da trava interna; Chaves; Cilindro da fechadura; Peças de montagem; Controle(s) remoto(s); Chicote elétrico; Outro
th: ส่วนประกอบของระบบล็อคประตูรถยนต์: โมดูลควบคุม; สลักประตู; แอคชูเอเตอร์ล็อกประตู; จุดเชื่อมต่อมือจับภายนอก; ปุ่ม/ก้านล็อกภายใน; กุญแจ; กระบอกกุญแจ; ฮาร์ดแวร์สำหรับยึด; กุญแจรีโมท; ชุดสายไฟ; อื่นๆ
fi: Ajoneuvon oven lukon mukana toimitettavat komponentit: Ohjausyksikkö; Oven salpa; Oven lukon toimilaite; Ulkokahvan vivusto; Sisälukon nuppi/tanko; Avaimet; Lukkosylinteri; Asennustarvikkeet; Kaukosäätimet; Johtosarja; Muu
zh-CN: 车辆门锁包含的组件: 控制模块; 车门锁舌; 车门锁执行器; 外门把手连杆; 内门锁旋钮/拉杆; 钥匙; 锁芯; 安装硬件; 遥控钥匙; 线束; 其他
sk-SK: Súčasťou balenia komponentov zámku dverí vozidla: Riadiaci modul; Západka dverí; Ovládač zámku dverí; Tiahlo vonkajšej kľučky; Gombík/tiahlo vnútorného zámku; Kľúče; Vložka zámku; Montážny materiál; Diaľkový ovládač; Káblový zväzok; Iné
ko: 차량 도어 잠금장치 포함 구성품: 제어 모듈; 도어 래치; 도어 잠금 액추에이터; 외부 핸들 링키지; 내부 잠금 노브/로드; 키; 잠금 실린더; 마운팅 하드웨어; 원격 리모컨; 배선 하네스; 기타
pl: Dołączone komponenty zamka drzwi pojazdu: Moduł sterujący; Zamek drzwi; Siłownik zamka drzwi; Cięgno klamki zewnętrznej; Wewnętrzne pokrętło/drążek zamka; Kluczyki; Wkładka zamka; Elementy montażowe; Pilot(y) zdalnego sterowania; Wiązka przewodów; Inne
tr: Araç kapı kilidi paket içeriği: Kontrol modülü; Kapı mandalı; Kapı kilidi aktüatörü; Dış kapı kolu bağlantısı; İç kilit düğmesi/çubuğu; Anahtarlar; Kilit silindiri; Montaj donanımı; Uzaktan kumanda; Kablo tesisatı; Diğer